Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB935.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 109. Areas where landfills are prohibited.A landfill designed, operated or maintained for the disposal 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 of municipal waste, residual waste or hazardous waste may not be located within three miles of the border of a municipality having a population density of at least 1,000 residents per one square mile. This section shall apply to a landfill seeking a permit from the department to initially open, reopen or expand operations which has not been finally granted by the department and a court having final jurisdiction, as applicable.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0935PN1001 - 2 - 12345678